Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.125

Violations—Refusal to file reports, perform duties, etc.

The willful refusal by a trustee to make or file any report or to perform any other duties expressly required by this chapter, or to comply with any valid rule adopted by the secretary of state under this chapter, shall constitute a breach of trust and a violation of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 471 s 32; 1985 c 30 s 126. Prior: 1971 ex.s. c 226 s 6. Formerly RCW 19.10.125.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 471: See RCW 19.09.915.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.